Utah statutes.
39-1-23.   Seal of adjutant general.

The seal of the adjutant general shall be circular in form, containing an inner circle; within the inner circle shall be a shield with "Utah" impressed thereon, and between the circles shall be impressed "National Guard, Adjutant General."

